Louisiana, session 2026, HB536.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. This Act shall be known and may be cited as the "School Infrastructure
Safety and Emergency Coordination Act".
Section 2.(A) The legislature finds and declares that the state of Louisiana has a
compelling interest in protecting students, faculty, and school property from structural
hazards, falling debris, fire risks, and emergency access obstructions associated with tall
structures.
(B) The legislature finds and declares that schools require coordinated emergency
planning in areas where critical infrastructure is located nearby.
(C) The legislature finds and declares that equipment, structures, and improvements
used to provide personal wireless services are essential infrastructure supporting public
safety, emergency services, education, and commerce.
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1349 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 536
Section 3. R.S. 17:2111 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§2111. Wireless communication facilities
A. The purpose of this Section is to provide for safety with respect to the
placement of wireless communication facilities near schools while preserving the
availability of wireless services. As used in this Section:
(1) "Colocation" means the placement of wireless transmission equipment
on an existing structure, including towers, utility poles, water towers, rooftops, or
similar structures.
(2) "School" means any elementary or secondary school.
(3) "School proximity zone" means an area within one thousand feet of a
school property boundary.
(4) "Wireless communication facility" means equipment, structures, and
improvements used to provide personal wireless services.
B. A newly constructed freestanding wireless tower located within a school
proximity zone shall maintain a setback from any school building equal to at least
one hundred ten percent of the tower height. This requirement shall not apply to the
following:
(1) Antennas colocated on existing structures.
(2) Concealed or stealth installations.
(3) Facilities where a licensed professional engineer certifies that an
alternative setback provides equivalent structural safety.
C.(1) An applicant proposing construction of a new freestanding tower
within a school proximity zone shall demonstrate good faith efforts to colocate on
existing structures, including but not limited to the following:
(a) Identification of suitable existing structures within the search area.
(b) Written requests to structure owners.
(c) Documentation of responses received.
(d) Engineering analysis where colocation is determined infeasible.
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1349 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 536
(2) Colocation is not required if it is determined to be technically infeasible
or economically unreasonable by the applicable state or local entity.
D.(1) Construction of a new freestanding wireless tower within a school
proximity zone shall require a conditional use permit from the applicable state or
local entity. Granting of the permit shall be based on the following considerations:
(a) Structural integrity and wind-load compliance.
(b) Fall radius and debris mitigation.
(c) Fire code compliance.
(d) Emergency vehicle access.
(e) Security fencing and restricted access.
(f) Reasonable visual mitigation measures.
(2) If the permit is denied, the denial shall be in writing, supported by
substantial evidence, and issued within applicable federal timeframes.
E. Operators of freestanding towers within a school proximity zone shall
provide current emergency contact information to the school, certify annual
structural inspection compliance, and coordinate disaster response planning upon the
school's request.
F. Subsequent modifications to such towers shall be made in compliance
with applicable federal law.
G. Nothing in this Section shall be:
(1) Construed to regulate radio frequency emissions or the technical
operation of wireless communication services.
(2) Construed to prohibit or have the effect of prohibiting the provision of
personal wireless services.
(3) Be applied in a manner inconsistent with 47 U.S.C. 332 or other
applicable federal law.
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1349 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 536